California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(c) The net increase in full-time employees of a qualified taxpayer shall be determined as provided by this subdivision:

(1) (A) The net increase in full-time employees shall be determined on an annual full-time equivalent basis by subtracting from the amount determined in subparagraph (C) the amount determined in subparagraph (B).

(B) The total number of full-time employees employed in the base year by the taxpayer and by any trade or business acquired by the
 taxpayer during the current taxable year.

(C) The total number of full-time employees employed in the current taxable year by the taxpayer and by any trade or business acquired during the current taxable year.

(2) For taxpayers who first commence doing business in this state during the taxable year, the number of full-time employees for the base year shall be zero.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) All employees of the trades or businesses that are treated as related under Section 267, 318, or 707 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as employed by a single taxpayer.

(2) In determining whether the taxpayer has first commenced doing business in this state during the taxable
 year, the provisions of subdivision (g) of Section 24416, without application of paragraph (7) of that subdivision, apply.

(e) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), to be eligible for the credit allowed by this section, a qualified taxpayer shall, upon hiring a qualified full-time employee, request a tentative credit reservation from the Franchise Tax Board within 30 days of complying with the Employment Development Department’s new hire reporting requirement as provided in Section 1088.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(B) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2024, to be eligible for the credit allowed by this section, a qualified taxpayer described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph
 (14) of subdivision (b) shall, upon hiring a qualified full-time employee, request a tentative credit reservation from the Franchise Tax Board on or before the last day of the month following the close of the taxable year for which the credit is claimed, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) To obtain a tentative credit reservation with respect to a qualified full-time employee, the qualified taxpayer shall provide necessary information, as determined by the Franchise Tax Board, including the name, the social security number, the start date of employment, the rate of pay of the qualified full-time employee, the qualified taxpayer’s gross receipts, less returns and allowances, for the previous taxable year, and whether the qualified full-time employee is a resident of a targeted employment area, as defined in former Section 7072 of the Government Code, as in effect on December 31, 2013.

(3) The qualified taxpayer shall provide the Franchise Tax Board an annual certification of employment with respect to each qualified full-time employee hire in a previous taxable year, on or before the 15th day of the third month of the taxable year. The certification shall include necessary information, as determined by the Franchise Tax Board, including the name, social security number, start date of employment, and rate of pay for each qualified full-time employee employed by the qualified taxpayer.

(4) (A) A qualified taxpayer, as defined under clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14) of subdivision (b), shall, upon request, provide to the Franchise Tax Board the applicable verification specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14) of subdivision (b).

(B) The
 verification shall be provided in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(C) Any disallowance of a credit claimed due to a failure to provide verification under this paragraph shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return. Any amount of tax resulting from such disallowance may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section 19051.

(5) A tentative credit reservation provided to a taxpayer with respect to an employee of that taxpayer shall not constitute a determination by the Franchise Tax Board with respect to any of the requirements of this section regarding a taxpayer’s eligibility for the credit authorized by this section.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board shall do all of the following:

(1) Approve a tentative credit reservation with respect to a qualified full-time employee hired during a calendar year.

(2) Determine the aggregate tentative reservation amount and the aggregate small business tentative reservation amount for a calendar year.

(3) A tentative credit reservation request from a qualified taxpayer with respect to a qualified full-time employee who is a resident of a targeted employment area, as defined in former Section 7072 of the Government Code, as in effect on December 31, 2013, shall be expeditiously processed by the Franchise Tax Board. The residence of a qualified full-time employee in a targeted employment area shall have no other effect on the eligibility of an individual as a qualified full-time employee or the eligibility of a qualified taxpayer for the credit authorized by this section.

(4) Notwithstanding Section 19542, provide as a searchable database on its internet website, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2026, the employer names, amounts of tax credit claimed, and number of new jobs created for each taxable year pursuant to this section and Section 17053.73.

(g) (1) The Department of Finance shall, by January 1, 2014, and by January 1 of every fifth year thereafter, provide the Franchise Tax Board with a list of the designated census tracts and a list of census tracts with the lowest civilian unemployment rate.

(2) The redesignation of designated census tracts and lowest civilian unemployment census tracts by the Department of Finance as provided in Section 13073.5 of the Government Code shall be effective, for purposes of
 this credit, one year after the date that the Department of Finance redesignates the designated census tracts.

(h) (1) For purposes of this section:

(A) All employees of the trades or businesses that are treated as related under Section 267, 318, or 707 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as employed by a single qualified taxpayer.

(B) All employees of all corporations that are members of the same controlled group of corporations shall be treated as employed by a single qualified taxpayer.

(C) The credit, if any, allowable by this section to each member shall be determined by reference to its proportionate share of the expense of the qualified wages giving rise to the credit, and shall be allocated in that manner.

(D) If a qualified taxpayer acquires the major portion of a trade or business of another taxpayer, hereinafter in this paragraph referred to as the predecessor, or the major portion of a separate unit of a trade or business of a predecessor, then, for purposes of applying this section for any taxable year ending after that acquisition, the employment relationship between a qualified full-time employee and a qualified taxpayer shall not be treated as terminated if the employee continues to be employed in that trade or business.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “controlled group of corporations” means a controlled group of corporations as defined in Section 1563(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that:

(A) “More than 50 percent” shall be substituted for “at least 80 percent” each place it appears in Section
 1563(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) The determination shall be made without regard to subsections (a)(4) and (e)(3)(C) of Section 1563 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Rules similar to the rules provided in Sections 46(e) and 46(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, as in effect on November 4, 1990, shall apply to both of the following:

(A) An organization to which Section 593 of the Internal Revenue Code applies.

(B) A regulated investment company or a real estate investment trust subject to taxation under this part.

(i) (1) If the employment of any qualified full-time employee, with respect to whom qualified wages are taken into account under subdivision (a),
 is terminated by the qualified taxpayer at any time during the first 36 months after commencing employment with the qualified taxpayer, whether or not consecutive, the tax imposed by this part for the taxable year in which that employment is terminated shall be increased by an amount equal to the credit allowed under subdivision (a) for that taxable year and all prior taxable years attributable to qualified wages paid or incurred with respect to that employee.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to any of the following:

(A) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee who voluntarily leaves the employment of the qualified taxpayer.

(B) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee who, before the close of the period referred to in paragraph (1), becomes disabled and unable to perform the
 services of that employment, unless that disability is removed before the close of that period and the qualified taxpayer fails to offer reemployment to that employee.

(C) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee, if it is determined that the termination was due to the misconduct, as defined in Sections 1256-30 to 1256-43, inclusive, of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, of that employee.

(D) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee due to a substantial reduction in the trade or business operations of the qualified taxpayer, including reductions due to seasonal employment.

(E) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee, if that employee is replaced by other qualified full-time employees so as to create a net increase in both the number of
 employees and the hours of employment.

(F) A termination of employment of a qualified full-time employee, when that employment is considered seasonal employment and the qualified employee is rehired on a seasonal basis.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (1), the employment relationship between the qualified taxpayer and a qualified full-time employee shall not be treated as terminated by reason of a mere change in the form of conducting the trade or business of the qualified taxpayer, if the qualified full-time employee continues to be employed in that trade or business and the qualified taxpayer retains a substantial interest in that trade or business.

(4) An increase in tax under paragraph (1) shall not be treated as tax imposed by this part for purposes of determining the amount of any credit allowable under this
 part.

(j) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and the succeeding four years if necessary, until exhausted.

(k) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(l) (1) Upon the effective date of this section, the Department of Finance shall estimate the total dollar amount of credits
 that will be claimed under this section with respect to each fiscal year from the 2013–14 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year, inclusive.

(2) (A) The Franchise Tax Board shall annually provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, by no later than March 1, a report of the total dollar amount of the credits claimed under this section with respect to the relevant fiscal year. The report shall compare the total dollar amount of credits claimed under this section with respect to that fiscal year with the department’s estimate with respect to that same fiscal year. If the total dollar amount of credits claimed for the fiscal year is less than the estimate for that fiscal year, the report shall identify options for increasing annual claims of the credit so as to meet estimated amounts.

(B) Beginning March 1, 2025, the report required by this paragraph shall
 include information relating to the total dollar amount of the credits claimed under this section by taxpayers described in clause (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (14) of subdivision (b).

(m) (1) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), this section shall continue to be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, but only with respect to qualified full-time employees who commenced employment with a qualified taxpayer in a designated census tract or economic development area in a taxable year beginning before January 1, 2026.

(3) This section shall remain operative for any qualified taxpayer with respect to any qualified full-time
 employee after the designated census tract is no longer designated or an economic development area ceases to be an economic development area, as defined in this section, for the remaining period, if any, of the 60-month period after the original date of hiring of an otherwise qualified full-time employee and any wages paid or incurred with respect to those qualified full-time employees after the designated census tract is no longer designated or an economic development area ceases to be an economic development area, as defined in this section, shall be treated as qualified wages under this section, provided the employee satisfies any other requirements of paragraphs (13) and (15) of subdivision (b), as if the designated census tract was still designated and binding or the economic development area was still in existence.

(n) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on
 or after January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 55, Sec. 12.   (SB 131)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2029, with remaining operation, as prescribed in subdivision (m).)
-------------------------------------------

23628.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, there shall be allowed a small business hiring credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, to a qualified small business employer that receives a tentative credit reservation under Section 6902.10, in an amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) The amount of credit determined by this subdivision shall be equal to the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A) minus the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(A) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for each net increase in qualified employees, as specified in subdivision (c), not to exceed one hundred fifty
 thousand dollars ($150,000).

(B) If the qualified small business employer received a tentative credit reservation amount pursuant to Section 6902.8, either of the following applies:

(i) For a qualified small business employer that made an irrevocable election pursuant to Section 6902.8 to apply the credit against qualified sales and use taxes pursuant to Section 6902.7, the credit amounts allocated to the qualified small business employer pursuant to Sections 6902.7 and 6902.8.

(ii) For a qualified small business employer that elected to apply the credit under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or both, the tentative credit reservation amount received by the qualified small business employer pursuant to Section 6902.8.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Monthly full-time equivalent” means either of the following:

(A) In the case of a qualified employee paid hourly qualified wages, “monthly full-time equivalent” means the total number of hours employed per month for the qualified small business employer by the qualified employee, not to exceed 167 hours per month per qualified employee, divided by 167.

(B) In the case of a salaried qualified employee, “monthly full-time equivalent” means the total number of weeks employed per month for the qualified small business employer by the qualified employee divided by 4.33 multiplied by the time base the qualified employee was employed.

(2) (A) “Qualified employee” means an employee who is paid qualified wages by a qualified small business employer.

(B) “Qualified employee” shall not include an employee whose qualified wages are included in calculating any other credit allowed under this part, except for the credit allowed under Section 23627.

(3) (A) “Qualified small business employer” means a taxpayer that as of December 31, 2020, employed a total of 500 or fewer qualified employees and meets either of the following requirements:

(i) Has a decrease of 20 percent or more in gross receipts determined by comparing gross receipts beginning on January 1, 2020, and ending on December 31, 2020, to the gross receipts beginning on January 1, 2019, and ending on December 31, 2019.

(ii) Is a fiscal year filer that has a decrease of 20 percent or more in gross receipts determined by comparing either of the following:

(I) The gross receipts for fiscal year 2019–20 to the gross receipts from fiscal year 2018–19.

(II) The average of gross receipts for fiscal year 2019–20 and fiscal year 2020–21 to the gross receipts from fiscal year 2018–19.

(iii) For a taxpayer that first commences business after January 1, 2019, but on or before January 1, 2020, has a decrease of 20 percent or more in gross receipts in the second quarter of 2020 determined by comparing gross receipts from January 1, 2020, through February 28, 2020, multiplied by 1.5 to the gross receipts for the period beginning on April 1, 2020, and ending on June 30, 2020.

(B) “Qualified small business employer” does not include a taxpayer required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110 or authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15.

(4) “Qualified wages” means wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(5) “Time base” means the fraction of full-time employment that the qualified employee is employed.

(6) “Weeks employed” means the total number of calendar days that a qualified employee was employed by the qualified small business employer during the month, divided by seven, not to exceed 4.33.

(c) The net increase in qualified employees of
 a qualified small business employer shall be equal to the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) minus the amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(1) The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed during the three-month period beginning on April 1, 2020, and ending on June 30, 2020, by the qualified small business employer. The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees is determined by adding the total monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed by the qualified small business employer for all three months and dividing the total by three.

(2) The lesser of either of the following:

(A) The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed during the 12-month period beginning on July 1, 2020, and ending on June 30, 2021, by the qualified
 small business employer. The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees is determined by adding the total monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed by the qualified small business employer for all 12 months and dividing the total by 12.

(B) The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed during the three-month period beginning on April 1, 2021, and ending on June 30, 2021, by the qualified small business employer. The average monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees is determined by adding the total monthly full-time equivalent qualified employees employed by the qualified small business employer for all three months and dividing the total by three.

(d) If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and succeeding four years if necessary,
 until the credit is exhausted.

(e) A deduction otherwise allowed under this part for qualified wages shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed under this section.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) All employees of the trades or businesses that are treated as related under Section 267, 318, or 707 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as employed by a single qualified small business employer.

(2) If a qualified small business employer changes its business form to a different entity type after receiving a tentative credit reservation under Section 6902.10 and continues operation, the new entity shall be allowed the credit, and the determination of the amount of the credit under this section with respect to qualified wages paid or
 incurred by the qualified small business employer shall apply to the new entity as if those qualified wages were paid or incurred by the new entity.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 23803, an “S” corporation that makes the election under Section 6902.10 shall be allowed to apply the full credit amount against qualified sales and use tax, and no amount of credit shall be allowed to reduce the shareholder’s liability under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001).

(h) A disallowance of a credit claimed due to the application of the limitation specified in Section 6902.10 shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return. An amount of tax resulting from that disallowance may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section 19051.

(i) (1) The Franchise Tax
 Board may prescribe any regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt rules, guidelines, procedures, or other guidance to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any regulation, rule, guideline, procedure, or other guidance adopted by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(j) Notwithstanding Section 19542, the Franchise Tax Board may provide to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, only to the extent allowed under federal law, information related to the credit allowed by Section 6902.9, this section, and Section 17053.71, including, but not limited to, the qualified small business employer names, amounts of tax credits allowed under each section, amount of
 gross receipts, and the net increase in qualified employees.

(k) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 55 of the Statutes of 2022 shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022.

(l) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 211.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of December 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23629.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer that employs an eligible individual a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, an amount as determined pursuant to paragraph (2), not to exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per taxpayer per taxable year.

(2) A qualified taxpayer shall be allowed the credit pursuant to this section in the following amounts per taxable year:

(A) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each eligible individual that works at least 500 hours, but fewer than 1,000 hours, for the eligible employer during the taxable year in which the
 credit is claimed.

(B) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each eligible individual that works at least 1,000 hours, but fewer than 1,500 hours, for the eligible employer during the taxable year in which the credit is claimed.

(C) Seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) for each eligible individual that works at least 1,500 hours, but fewer than 2,000 hours, for the eligible employer during the taxable year in which the credit is claimed.

(D) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each eligible individual that works at least 2,000 hours for the eligible employer during the taxable year in which the credit is claimed.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Continuum of care” has the same
 meaning as in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Coordinated entry system” means a centralized or coordinated assessment system developed pursuant to Section 578.7 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, designed to coordinate homelessness program participant intake, assessment, and provision of referrals.

(3) “Eligible employer” means a taxpayer that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Pays wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(B) Pays at least 120 percent of minimum wage.

(C) Provides to the Franchise Tax Board, upon request, a copy of the certification received
 for each eligible individual for each tax year that the credit is claimed for that eligible individual by that eligible employer.

(4) “Eligible individual” means a person who meets both of the following criteria:

(A) The person is homeless or has received supportive services from a homeless services provider, as designated by a local continuum of care or a community-based service provider that is connected to the local coordinated entry system or to a local Homeless Management Information System, on the date of the hire or anytime during the 180-day period immediately before the hire.

(B) The person has been issued a certification pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), and that certification has not expired.

(5) “Homeless Management Information System” has the same meaning as in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations. “Homeless Management Information System” includes the use of a comparable database by a victim services provider or legal services provider that is permitted by the federal government under Part 576 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(6) “Person is homeless” means the same as
 “homeless” as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(7) “Minimum wage” means the wage established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(8) “Qualified taxpayer” means an eligible employer that pays wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code to an eligible individual.

(c) (1) A credit shall not be allowed under this section unless the eligible employer submits to the Franchise Tax Board, upon request, a certification issued by a continuum of care, or a community-based service provider that is connected to the local coordinated entry system or to a local Homeless Management Information System, or other program as specified by the
 Franchise Tax Board.

(2) A continuum of care or a community-based service provider that is connected to the local coordinated entry system or to a local Homeless Management Information System, shall issue certifications for eligible individuals.

(3) The certification pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be issued in a form and manner prescribed by Franchise Tax Board.

(4) A certification issued pursuant to this subdivision shall expire one year after issuance.

(5) An eligible individual may receive a new certification pursuant to this subdivision if they are homeless or have received supportive services from a homeless services provider, as designated by a local continuum of
 care or a community-based service provider that is connected to the local coordinated entry system or to a local Homeless Management Information System, on the date that the eligible individual receives a new certification or anytime during the 180-day period immediately before that date.

(d) (1) The total aggregate amount of the credit that may be allocated by credit reservations per calendar year to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to this section and Section 17053.80 shall not exceed thirty million dollars ($30,000,000), plus the unallocated credit amount, if any, from the preceding calendar year.

(2) (A) To be eligible for the credit allowed by this section with respect to an eligible individual, a qualified taxpayer shall request a credit reservation from the Franchise Tax Board, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, consistent with either of the following, as applicable:

(i) Within 30 days of hiring an eligible individual.

(ii) Within 60 days of receiving a new certification pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).

(B) To obtain a credit reservation with respect to an eligible individual, the qualified taxpayer shall provide necessary information, as determined by the Franchise Tax Board, including the name, social security number, how
 many hours the eligible individual is expected to work for the next 12 months, and the start date of employment.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall do both of the following:

(A) Approve a tentative credit reservation with respect to an eligible individual.

(B) Subject to the annual cap established as provided in paragraph (1), allocate an aggregate amount of credits under this section and Section 17053.80, and allocate any carryover of unallocated credits from prior years.

(e) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding two years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(f) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, a deduction otherwise allowed under this part for any amount of wages paid or
 incurred by the qualified taxpayer as a trade or business expense to an eligible individual shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed by this section.

(g) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 55, Sec. 13.   (AB 194)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23630.

(a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, an amount equal to 55 percent of the fair market value of any qualified contribution made on or after January 1, 2000, and not later than June 30, 2008, on or after January 1, 2010, and not later than June 30, 2020, and on or after January 1, 2021, and not later than June 30, 2026, by the taxpayer during the taxable year to the state, any local government, or any designated nonprofit organization, pursuant to Division 28 (commencing with Section 37000) of the Public Resources Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified contribution” means a contribution of property, as defined in Section 37002 of the Public Resources Code, that has been approved for acceptance by the
 Wildlife Conservation Board pursuant to Division 28 (commencing with Section 37000) of the Public Resources Code.

(c) In the case of any pass-thru entity, the fair market value of any qualified contribution approved for acceptance under Division 28 (commencing with Section 37000) of the Public Resources Code shall be passed through to the partners or shareholders of the pass-thru entity in accordance with their interest in the pass-thru entity as of the date of the qualified contribution. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “pass-thru entity” means any partnership or “S” corporation.

(d) (1) For a qualified contribution made on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2015, if the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and the succeeding seven years if
 necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(2) For a qualified contribution made on or after January 1, 2015, if the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and the succeeding 14 years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(e) This credit shall be in lieu of any other credit or deduction that the taxpayer may otherwise claim pursuant to this part with respect to the property or any interest therein that is contributed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 419, Sec. 2.   (AB 1219)   Effective September 30, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23636.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2016, and before January 1, 2031, a qualified taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, in an amount equal to 1712 percent of qualified wages paid or incurred by the qualified
 taxpayer during the taxable year to qualified full-time employees, subject to the limitations under subdivision (c).

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Annual full-time equivalent” means either of the following:

(A) In the case of a qualified full-time employee paid hourly qualified wages, “annual full-time equivalent” means the total number of hours worked for the qualified taxpayer by the qualified full-time employee, not to exceed 2,000 hours per employee, divided by 2,000.

(B) In the case of a salaried qualified full-time employee, “annual full-time equivalent” means the total number of weeks worked for the qualified taxpayer by the qualified employee divided by 52.

(2) “Qualified
 full-time employee” means an individual that is employed in this state by the qualified taxpayer and satisfies both of the following:

(A) The individual’s services for the qualified taxpayer are performed in this state and are at least 80 percent directly related to the qualified taxpayer’s prime contract or subcontract to design, test, manufacture property, or otherwise support production of property for ultimate use in or as a component of a new advanced strategic aircraft for the United States Air Force.

(B) The individual is paid compensation from the qualified taxpayer that satisfies either of the following conditions:

(i) Is paid qualified wages by the qualified taxpayer for services not less than an average of 35 hours per week.

(ii) Is paid a
 salary by the qualified taxpayer as compensation during the taxable year for full-time employment, within the meaning of Section 515 of the Labor Code.

(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means any taxpayer that is either a prime contractor awarded a prime contract or a major first-tier subcontractor awarded a subcontract to manufacture property for ultimate use in or as a component of a new advanced strategic aircraft for the United States Air Force. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “prime contractor” means a contractor that was awarded a prime contract for the manufacturing of a new advanced strategic aircraft for the United States Air Force. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “major first-tier subcontractor” means a subcontractor that was awarded a subcontract in an amount of at least 35 percent of the amount of the initial prime contract awarded for the manufacturing of a new advanced strategic aircraft for the United States Air
 Force.

(4) “Qualified wages” means wages paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year with respect to qualified full-time employees that are direct labor costs, within the meaning of Section 263A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to capitalization and inclusion in inventory costs of certain expenses, allocable to property manufactured in this state by the qualified taxpayer for ultimate use in or as a component of a new advanced strategic aircraft for the United States Air Force.

(5) “New advanced strategic aircraft for the United States Air Force” means a new advanced strategic aircraft developed and produced for the United States Air Force under the New Advanced Strategic Aircraft Program.

(6) “New Advanced Strategic Aircraft Program” means the project to design, test, manufacture, or
 otherwise support production of a new advanced strategic aircraft for the United States Air Force under a contract that is expected to be awarded in the first or second calendar quarter of 2015. “New Advanced Strategic Aircraft Program” does not include any contract awarded prior to August 1, 2014, and does not include a program to upgrade, modernize, sustain, or otherwise modify a current United States Air Force bomber program, including, but not limited to, the B-52, B-1, or B-2 programs.

(7) “Total annual full-time equivalents” means the number of a qualified taxpayer’s qualified full-time employees computed on an annual full-time equivalent basis for the taxable year.

(c) (1) The total aggregate amount of the credit that may be allowed to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to this section shall be as follows:

(A) In years one through five of the credit, the total aggregate amount of the credit that may be allowed to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to this section shall not exceed twenty- five million dollars ($25,000,000) per calendar year.

(B) In years 6 through 10 of the credit, the total aggregate amount of the credit that may be allowed to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to this section shall not exceed twenty-eight million dollars ($28,000,000) per calendar year.

(C) In years 11 through 15 of the credit, the total aggregate amount of the credit that may be allowed to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to this section shall not exceed thirty-one million dollars ($31,000,000) per calendar year.

(2) The aggregate number of total annual full-time equivalents of
 all qualified taxpayers with respect to which a credit amount may be allowed under this section for a calendar year shall not exceed 1,100.

(3) (A) The Franchise Tax Board shall allocate the credit to the qualified taxpayers on a first-come-first-served basis, determined by the date the qualified taxpayer’s timely filed original tax return is received by the Franchise Tax Board. If the returns of two or more qualified taxpayers are received on the same day and the amount of credit remaining to be allocated is insufficient to be allocated fully to each, the credit remaining shall be allocated to those qualified taxpayers on a pro rata basis.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the date a return is received shall be determined by the Franchise Tax Board. The determination of the Franchise Tax Board as to the date a return is received and whether a return has
 been timely filed for purposes of this paragraph may not be reviewed in any administrative or judicial proceeding.
